Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-218
Beatrice State
Developmental Center; purpose.

The Beatrice State
Developmental Center shall provide residential care and humane treatment for
those persons with intellectual disabilities who
require residential care, shall study to improve their condition, shall classify
them, and shall furnish such training in industrial, mechanical, agricultural,
and academic subjects as they may be capable of learning. Whenever the Department
of Health and Human Services determines that continued residence in the Beatrice
State Developmental Center is no longer necessary for the welfare, care, treatment,
or training of such person, it shall have authority to discharge or transfer
such person as provided in section 83-387. The Department of Health and Human
Services shall discharge any person from the Beatrice State Developmental
Center without requiring sterilization of such person, if the discharge satisfies
the requirements of this section, notwithstanding any court order, judgment,
or decree rendered prior to December 25, 1969, requiring sterilization as
a condition of discharge.

Laws 1885, c. 52, § 2, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 7221;

Laws 1921, c. 241, § 1, p. 843;

C.S.1922, § 6879;

C.S.1929, § 83-402;

R.S.1943, § 83-218;

Laws 1967, c. 251, § 5, p. 663;

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 14, p. 3068;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 45;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 937;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 51.

Rights of persons admitted, see sections 83-381 to 83-390.